California, session 20252026, AB1198.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1773.6 of the Labor Code is amended to read:1773.6. (a) If during any quarterly period the Director of Industrial Relations shall determine that there has been a change in any prevailing rate of per diem wages in any locality, the director shall make that change available to the awarding body and the director’s determination shall be final. This determination by the Director of Industrial Relations shall not be effective as to any contract for which the notice to bidders has been published.(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2027, 2028, is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 1773.6 is added to the Labor Code, to read:1773.6. (a) If during any semiannual period the Director of Industrial Relations determines that there has been a change in any prevailing rate of per diem wages in any locality, the director shall make that change available to the awarding body and the director’s determination shall be final, except as specified in this section. This determination by the director shall only apply on its effective date to any contract under this chapter that is awarded or for which notice to bidders is published after July 1, 2026. 2027.(b) (1) Any contractor, awarding body, or representative of any craft, classification, or type of work affected by a change in rates on a particular contract may, within 20 days after publication of the new determination, file with the director a verified petition to review the determination of that rate upon the ground that it has not been determined in accordance with Section 1773. Within two days after the filing of the petition, a copy of that petition shall be filed with the awarding body. The petition shall set forth the facts upon which it is based.(2) The director, or the director’s authorized representative, shall, upon notice to the petitioner, the awarding body, and other persons the director deems proper, including the recognized collective bargaining representatives for the particular crafts, classifications, or types of work involved, initiate an investigation or hold a hearing. Within 20 days after the filing of that petition, or within a longer period as agreed upon by the director, awarding body, and all interested parties, the director shall make a determination and transmit that determination in writing to the awarding body and to the interested parties. This determination shall be final.(c) A determination issued by the director is effective 10 days after its issuance. The director shall include an issue date on the determination. The determination shall remain in effect until it is modified, rescinded, or superseded by the director.(d) This section does not apply to contracts for a housing development project if 100 percent of the units, excluding managers’ units, are restricted by deed, regulatory restrictions contained in an agreement with a governmental agency, or other recorded document as affordable housing for persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, or subject to an agreement that provides housing subsidies for affordable housing for persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code or comparable federal statutes.(d)(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026. 2027.SEC. 3. Section 1773.65 is added to the Labor Code, to read:1773.65. (a) Notwithstanding Section 1773.6, subdivision (b) shall apply to a change in the prevailing rate for public works projects that are housing developments described in subdivision (d) of Section 1773.6.(b) If, during any quarterly period, the Director of Industrial Relations determines that there has been a change in any prevailing rate of per diem wages in any locality, the director shall make that change available to the awarding body and the director’s determination shall be final. This determination by the director shall not be effective as to any contract for which notice to bidders has been published or as to any contract that has been awarded.(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.